Hawaii statutes.
§621-1 Subpoena, issue of. The clerks
of the several courts shall issue writs of subpoena as provided by the rules of
court or by statute. Except as otherwise provided, the clerks shall issue to
any prosecuting officer, and to any party plaintiff or defendant, in any cause,
civil or criminal, pending before such courts, or to the counsel of the party,
writs of subpoena for witnesses, in blank, so that the names of the witnesses
to be summoned may be inserted after the issuing of the writs. [L 1876, c 32,
§1; am imp L 1905, c 39, §95; am imp L 1907, c 118, §116; RL 1925, §2556; am
imp L 1932 1st, cc 1, 13, §1; RL 1935, §3810; RL 1945, §9821; RL 1955, §222-1;
am L 1957, c 124, §1; am L 1963, c 85, §3; HRS §621-1; am L 1972, c 104, §1(a)]

Cross References

Fees for issuing and serving subpoena, see §§607-4, 607-5, 607-6,
and 607-8.

Rules of Court

See HRCP rule 45; HRPP rule 17; DCRCP rule 45.

Previous
Vol13_Ch0601-0676
Next